Arkansas, session 2025, SB6.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 63, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
5-63-206. Vaccine harm.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Executive officer” means a president, chair of an executive
committee, chief financial officer, or other individual with managerial
authority who performs similar functions to a president, chair of an
executive committee, or chief financial officer;
(2)(A) "Pharmaceutical company" means a business that is
registered with the United States Food and Drug Administration to
commercially research, develop, market, manufacture, and distribute
prescription drugs.
(B) "Pharmaceutical company" does not include a licensed,
registered, or otherwise permitted healthcare provider or healthcare
facility, such as a pharmacy, hospital, or pharmacist; and
(3) "Vaccination" means the introduction of a vaccine into the
body.
(b) A person commits vaccine harm if:
*JMB107*
03-06-2025 09:50:44 JMB107

As Engrossed: S1/16/25 S3/6/25 SB6
(1) The person is an executive officer for a pharmaceutical
company and is eighteen (18) years of age or older;
(2) The person introduces a vaccine produced by the
pharmaceutical company into the market;
(3) The person knowingly hides, conceals, omits, or otherwise
withholds evidence, documentation, or information that the vaccine has
dangerous effects;
(4) Another person receives the vaccine in this state through a
vaccination containing the vaccine; and
(5) The vaccination causes the death of or serious physical
injury to the other person.
(c) Vaccine harm is an unclassified felony with a sentence of
imprisonment of not less than one (1) year and not more than life.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 5, Subchapter 12, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
19-5-1287. Vaccine Harm Offense Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Vaccine Harm Offense Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Federal funds received through a grant;
(2) Appropriations from the General Assembly; and
(3) Other revenues and funds authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used to provide funding and support for the
prosecution of the offense of vaccine harm under § 5-63-206.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Expiration date.
(a) This act expires on December 31, 2026.
(b) On or after December 31, 2026, the Bureau of Legislative Research
or the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may remove from the Arkansas Code
the sections created in Sections 1 and 2 of this act.
(c) Any funds in the Vaccine Harm Offense Fund on December 31, 2026,
shall be transferred to the General Revenue Fund Account.

/s/B. King
03-06-2025 09:50:44 JMB107